Illinois, session 104th, SB1969.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Affordable Housing Act is amended 5by adding Section 19 as follows: 6    (310 ILCS 65/19 new)7    Sec. 19. Social services workers; senior congregate 8housing project. The Program Administrator, in collaboration 9with the Department of Human Services, shall establish and 10implement a program that places in each senior congregate 11housing project and any other affordable housing project for 12seniors at least one social services worker staffed by the 13Department of Human Services for every 12 senior residents 14occupying the housing project. A social services worker who is 15assigned to staff a housing project with 12 or less senior 16residents shall be available on site within the building's 17premises on a full-time basis for 2 regularly scheduled days 18of each week. At least 2 social services workers who are 19assigned to staff a housing project with more than 12 senior 20residents shall be available on site within the building's 21premises on a full-time basis for 3 regularly scheduled days 22of each week. Social services workers shall meet and engage 23with senior residents to evaluate and assess each resident's   SB1969- 2 -LRB104 09726 KTG 19792 b1particular needs and connect them to the appropriate resources 2and supports.